cs: Obsažené potřeby na zdobení vajíček: Štětec na zdobení; Barvicí tablety; Naběračky na vejce; Stojánky na vejce; Třpytky; Instruktážní brožurka; Popisovače; Barvy; Nálepky; Voskové pastelky; Jiné
es: Artículos para decoración de huevos incluidos.: Pincel de decoración; Tabletas de tinte; Canastita para huevos; Soportes para huevos; Purpurina; Folleto de instrucciones; Marcadores; Pintura; Pegatinas; Lápices de cera; Otros
bg-BG: Включени елементи за украса на яйца: Четка за декориране; Таблетки с багрило; За потапяне; Стойки за яйца; Блясък; Брошура с инструкции; Маркери; Боя; Стикери; Восъчни пастели; Други
el: Περιλαμβάνονται είδη διακόσμησης αυγών: Πινέλο διακόσμησης; Ταμπλέτες βαφής; Κουτάλες αυγών; Βάσεις αυγών; Γκλίτερ; Φυλλάδιο οδηγιών; Μαρκαδόροι; Πινέλο; Αυτοκόλλητα; Κηρομπογιές; Άλλο
ja: 卵のデコレーション関連のアイテム: デコレーションブラシ; 染料タブレット; エッグディッパー; エッグスタンド; グリッター; 説明書; マーカー; 塗料; シール; ワックスクレヨン; その他
zh-TW: 包括蛋形裝飾品: 裝飾刷; 染料片; 雞蛋湯匙; 蛋架; 亮粉; 說明書; 麥克筆; 油漆; 貼紙; 蠟筆; 其他
pl: W zestawie elementy do dekoracji jajek: Pędzel dekoracyjny; Tabletki barwnikowe; Dipy do jajek; Stoiska z jajkami; Brokat; Instrukcja obsługi; Markery; Farba; Naklejki; Kredki woskowe; Inne
hr-HR: Uključeni predmeti za ukrašavanje jaja: Kist za ukrašavanje; Tablete za bojenje; Držač za jaje; Stalak za jaje; Šljokice; Knjižica s uputama; Markeri; Boja; Naljepnice; Voštane bojice; Ostalo
ro-RO: Articole pentru decorarea ouălor incluse: Pensulă de decorat; Tablete de vopsea; Suporturi de scufundat ouă pentru vopsit; Suporturi pentru ouă; Sclipici; Broșură de instrucțiuni; Markere; Vopsea; Autocolante; Creioane cu ceară; Altele
da: Æggedekorationsartikler inkluderet: Dekorationsbørste; Farvetabletter; Æggedippere; Æggebægere; Glitter; Instruktionshæfte; Fremhævningspenne; Maling; Klistermærker; Farvekridt; Andet
hu: A tartalmazott tojásdíszítő árucikkek: Díszítő ecset; Festéktabletták; Tojásmerítők; Tojásállványok; Csillám; Használati utasítás; Filctollak; Festék; Matricák; Zsírkréták; Egyéb
lt-LT: Komplekte esančios kiaušinių dažymo priemonės: Dekoravimo teptukas; Dažų tabletės; Kiaušinių laikikliai; Kiaušinių stovai; Blizgučiai; Instrukcijos; Žymekliai; Dažai; Lipdukai; Vaško kreidelės; Kita
ko: 계란 장식 품목 포함: 장식용 브러쉬; 염료 정제; 에그 디퍼; 에그 스탠드; 반짝이; 지침서; 마커; 페인트; 스티커; 왁스 크레용; 기타
fr: Articles de décoration d’œufs inclus: Pinceau de décoration; Comprimés; Trempettes aux œufs; Supports à œufs; Paillettes; Livret d'instructions; Marqueurs; Peinture; Autocollants; Crayons gel; Autre
nl: Inclusief eiversieringsartikelen: Versierborstel; Kleurstoftabletten; Eierdippers; Eierstandaarden; Glitter; Instructieboekje; Markers; Verf; Stickers; Waskrijt; Andere
vi: Bao gồm các vật dụng trang trí trứng: Cọ trang trí; Viên nhuộm; Dụng cụ đỡ trứng; Giá đỡ trứng; Óng ánh; Sách hướng dẫn; Bút dạ; Sơn; Nhãn dán; Bút màu sáp; Khác
en: Egg decorating items included: Decorating brush; Dye tablets; Egg dippers; Egg stands; Glitter; Instruction booklet; Markers; Paint; Stickers; Wax crayons; Other
sl-SI: Priloženi elementi za okraševanje jajc: Čopič za dekoriranje; Tablete za barvanje; Pripomoček za namakanje jajc; Stojala za jajca; Bleščice; Knjižica z navodili; Markerji; Barva; Nalepke; Voščenke; Drugo
sv: Artiklar för äggdekoration ingår: Dekoreringsborste; Färgningstabletter; Äggdoppare; Äggkoppar; Glitter; Instruktionshäfte; Märkpennor; Målarfärg; Klistermärken; Vaxkritor; Övrigt
tr: Yumurta süsleme öğeleri dahil: Dekorasyon fırçası; Boya tabletleri; Yumurta kepçeleri; Yumurtalıklar; Simli; Talimat kitapçığı; Keçeli Kalemler; Boya; Çıkartmalar; Balmumu boya kalemi; Diğer
fi: Mukana munien koristelutuotteet: Koristelusivellin; Väriainetabletit; Kananmunadipit; Kananmunan pidikkeet; Kimalle; Ohjekirja; Tussit; Maali; Tarrat; Vahaliidut; Muu
th: รายการอุปกรณ์ตกแต่งไข่ที่รวมอยู่: แปรงตกแต่ง; ยาเม็ดย้อมสี; ที่วางไข่; ที่ตั้งไข่; กลิตเตอร์; คู่มือคำแนะนำ; ปากกามาร์กเกอร์; สี; สติกเกอร์; สีเทียนขี้ผึ้ง; อื่นๆ
de: Eierdekorationsartikel inbegriffen: Dekorationspinsel; Färbetabletten; Eierlöffel; Eierbecher; Glitzer; Anleitungsheft; Markierungen; Farbe; Sticker; Wachsmalstifte; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Itens de decoração de ovos incluídos: Pincel de decoração; Comprimidos de corante; Suportes de ovo; Suportes para ovos; Brilho; Livreto de instruções; Marcadores; Tintas; Adesivos; Giz de cera; Outro
sk-SK: Príslušenstvo na zdobenie vajíčok v cene: Štetec na zdobenie; Farbiace tablety; Naberačky na vajíčka; Stojany na vajíčka; Trblietavý; Návod na použitie; Fixky; Farba; Nálepky; Voskovky; Iné
nb: Eggdekorasjonsartikler inkludert: Dekorasjonsbørste; Fargetabletter; Eggedipere; Eggstativer; Glitter; Instruksjonshefte; Markørpenner; Maling; Klistremerker; Voksstifter; Annet
pt-PT: Itens de decoração de ovos incluídos: Pincel de decoração; Pastilhas de tinta; Mergulhadores de ovo; Suportes de ovo; Purpurinas; Livrete de instruções; Marcadores; Pintura; Autocolantes; Lápis de cera; Outro
it: Articoli per la decorazione delle uova inclusi: Pennello per decorare; Coloranti in pastiglie; Immergi uova; Supporti per uova; Glitter; Libretto di istruzioni; Pennarelli; Pittura; Adesivi; Pastelli a cera; Altro
ru: Состав набора для украшения пасхальных яиц: Кисть для декорирования; Таблетки красителя; Лопатки для яиц; Подставки для яиц; Блестящий; Инструкция; Маркеры; Краска; Наклейки; Восковые мелки; Другой
zh-CN: 包括彩蛋装饰物品: 装饰刷; 染色片; 鸡蛋座; 鸡蛋架; 闪粉; 说明书; 马克笔; 涂料; 贴纸; 蜡笔; 其他